Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8131 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma State Agency, Board,
and Commission Review Task Force.
B. The task force shall consist of nine (9) members, three of
whom shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
three of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1273 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Repr esentatives, and three of whom shall be appointed by the
Governor.
C. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives shall designate co-chairs for the task
force from among their respective appointees.
D. Meetings shall be held at the call of the co-chairs. The
task force shall meet at such time as established by the co-chairs.
E. The task force shall:
1. Review the efficiency, effectiveness, and necessity of all
state agencies, boards, and commissions of this state; and
2. Provide recommendations to the Legislature for the
elimination, consolidation, or alteration of the duties of state
agencies, boards, and commissions of this state.
F. Any reports or recommendations of the task force shall be
electronically submitted to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor, on or
before January 31, 2027, and annually thereafter.
G. Staffing for the task force shall be provided jointly by the
staff of the Senate and the House of Representatives.
H. Members of the task force shall serve without compensation
but may be reimbursed by the appointed authority for necessary
travel pursuant to the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1273 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ADMINISTRATIVE RULES
February 19, 2026 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1273 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)